Utah statutes.
67-22-1.   Compensation -- Constitutional offices.
(1)  The Legislature fixes salaries for the constitutional offices as follows:
(a)  governor:                          $109,900;
(b)  lieutenant governor:               95% of the governor's salary;
(c)  attorney general:                  95% of the governor's salary;
(d)  state auditor:                     95% of the governor's salary beginning
June 28, 2008; and
(e)  state treasurer:                   95% of the governor's salary.
(2)  The Legislature fixes benefits for the constitutional offices as follows:
(a)  Governor:
(i)  a vehicle for official and personal use;
(ii)  housing;
(iii)  household and security staff;
(iv)  household expenses;
(v)  retirement benefits as provided in Title 49;
(vi)  health insurance;
(vii)  dental insurance;
(viii)  basic life insurance;
(ix)  workers' compensation;
(x)  required employer contribution to Social Security;
(xi)  long-term disability income insurance; and
(xii)  the same additional state paid life insurance available to other
noncareer service employees.
(b)  Lieutenant governor, attorney general, state auditor, and state
treasurer:
(i)  a vehicle for official and personal use;
(ii)  the option of participating in a:
(A)  state retirement system in accordance with Title 49:
(I)  Chapter 12, Public Employees' Contributory Retirement Act;
(II)  Chapter 13, Public Employees' Noncontributory Retirement Act; or
(III)  Chapter 22, New Public Employees' Tier II Contributory Retirement Act;
or
(B)  deferred compensation plan administered by the State Retirement Office,
in accordance with the Internal Revenue Code and its accompanying rules and
regulations;
(iii)  health insurance;
(iv)  dental insurance;
(v)  basic life insurance;
(vi)  workers' compensation;
(vii)  required employer contribution to Social Security;
(viii)  long-term disability income insurance; and
(ix)  the same additional state paid life insurance available to other
noncareer service employees.
(c)  Each constitutional office shall pay the cost of the additional state-
paid life insurance for its constitutional officer from its existing budget.
